Washington statutes.
RCW 39.86.160

Executive orders.

If federal legislation is enacted or federal regulations are promulgated which affect the state ceiling, when the legislature is not in session or is less than forty-five days from the constitutional end of session, the governor may establish by executive order an alternative system for the allocation of tax exempt bonds under the state ceiling, effective until the legislature acts. In allocating or reallocating under this section, the governor shall take into account the requirements of federal law, the policy choices expressed in state law, and the projected needs of issuers.

[ 1987 c 297 s 7.]